Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Chapter 6. Preserves and Sanctuaries.

§ 29.1-600.
Licenses for shooting preserves.

The Director shall issue licenses for all shooting preserves when such preserves meet the requirements established pursuant to regulations. Commercially operated preserves initially licensed on and after July 1, 1994 shall meet local zoning and land use requirements. A fee of fifty dollars shall be collected for each such license issued to any preserve open to the public. A fee of fifty cents per acre for the first 300 acres and two dollars for each additional acre shall be collected for each license issued for other preserves. In no instance shall the license fee for a private preserve be less than fifty dollars. All license fees collected under this section shall be credited to the game protection fund. All such licenses shall expire on June 30 of each year.

Fees collected from such preserves shall only be used to administer this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-38; 1974, c. 102; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 424; 1994, c. 753.

§ 29.1-600.1.
Board to promulgate regulations.

The Board shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, requirements for the licensing and operation of all shooting preserves located within this Commonwealth. In promulgating such regulations the Board shall follow the procedure established in §§

29.1-501

through

29.1-504

. The Department may recover from the licensee actual costs incurred by the Department for investigating or disposing of shooting preserve animals that exhibit disease or are not properly confined in violation of Board regulations.

History.

1994, c. 753.

§ 29.1-601.
Applicant to own or have land under lease; boundaries.

No shooting preserve license shall be granted unless the applicant owns or leases the areas for which the shooting preserve license is desired. Boundaries of the area licensed shall be clearly defined by posting as shall be prescribed by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-39; 1987, c. 488; 1992, c. 254.

§ 29.1-602.
Applicant to develop land, release game and comply with other provisions.

The applicant shall (i) develop the lands to be licensed as a shooting preserve so as to meet such requirements as the Board may make, (ii) release game birds and animals as may be designated by the Board, and (iii) comply with such other provisions as the Board deems advisable.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-40; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-603.
No taking of game before compliance with requirements of Board.

Until the requirements specified by the Board have been fulfilled by the applicant to the satisfaction of the Board and certified to and accepted by the Board, it shall be unlawful to shoot, attempt to shoot, or to take any game of the species licensed under this chapter on premises so licensed.

A violation of this section shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-41; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 421.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-604.
Hunting, etc., after compliance with requirements.

When the requirements specified by the Board have been certified and accepted by the Board, and when such persons are otherwise lawfully entitled to hunt game, the licensee and such other persons as he may designate, because of payment of fees or otherwise, may hunt on the licensed premises, and shoot, possess, transport and dispose of by gift any game birds or animals of the species licensed. Game birds or animals not covered by the shooting preserve license may be taken and possessed by the licensee or his guests as otherwise provided by state law or regulation.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-42; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-605.
Reserved.

§ 29.1-606.
Seals to be attached to shot game; penalty.

No shot game of the species named in the license shall be removed from the licensed premises until there has been securely attached to the game or package of game a seal, the type and design of which shall be designated by the Board. The seal shall remain attached to the game or package of game until it is finally prepared for consumption.

A violation of this section shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-44; 1958, c. 492; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 421; 1990, c. 408.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-607.
Hunting season and bag limit.

The length of the hunting season on such preserves and the size of the bag limit shall be in accordance with rules of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-45; 1958, c. 491; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-608.
Repealed by Acts 1994, c. 753.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 753, which repealed this section, in cl. 2 provides that §

29.1-608

of the Code of Virginia is repealed upon the effective date of regulations promulgated pursuant to §

29.1-600.1

. See 4 VAC 15-40-260 et seq. for regulations.

Former §

29.1-608

, which authorized the board to make rules, was derived from Code 1950, § 29-46; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-609.
Revocation of license.

Any shooting preserve license may be revoked by the Director upon evidence that the provisions of the contract entered into by the license holder are being violated.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-47; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-610.
Portion of James River declared a no hunting area

The James River from Bosher’s Dam downstream to the Interstate 95 bridge is a no-hunting area. It is unlawful to take, attempt to take, or pursue wildlife within such area; however, fishing in such area is permitted as otherwise authorized by law.

History.

1987, c. 488; 2022, c. 235.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 235 rewrote the section, which read: “The James River, downstream from Bosher’s Dam to the Interstate 95 bridge, is hereby declared a no hunting area. It shall be unlawful to take, attempt to take, or pursue wildlife within this area; however, fishing in this area shall be is permitted as authorized by law.”

§ 29.1-611.
Penalty for violations.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-48; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-612.
Preserves, private clubs, associations.

Nothing in this title shall be construed as permitting any person to hunt, trap or fish in or on the lands or waters of any public or private club, association or preserve of any description as landowner or in any other capacity unless the person has a proper license.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-78; 1987, c. 488.